Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-183
National or state bank; conversion, merger, or consolidation; resulting bank; assets; valuation.

Without approval by the department, no asset shall be carried on the books of the resulting bank, when the resulting bank is a state bank, at a valuation higher than that on the books of the converting, merging, or consolidating bank at the time of the examination, by a state or national bank examiner, last occurring before the effective date of the conversion, merger, or consolidation.

Laws 1951, c. 11, § 1(6), p. 86;

R.R.S.1943, § 8-165.05;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 83, p. 167.